Utah statutes.
63M-1-1503.   Advisory board.
(1) (a)  There is created within the office the Utah Pioneer Communities
Advisory Board.
(b)  The Permanent Community Impact Fund Board created in Section 9-4-304
shall act as the advisory board.
(2)  The advisory board shall have the powers and duties described in Section
63M-1-1504 and shall operate the Utah Pioneer Communities Program in
accordance with Section 63M-1-1505.
(3)  The director shall designate an employee of the office to serve as a
nonvoting secretary for the advisory board.
(4)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's
service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:
(a)  Section 63A-3-106;
(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and
(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
